Georgia, session 2025_26, HB669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 10 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to capital outlay funds under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended in Code
Section 20-2-262, relating to low-wealth capital outlay grants to local school systems and
H. B. 669
- 1 -

LC 49 2311
criteria for eligibility, by redesignating subsection (g) as subsection (h) and by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(g) Each local school system which meets the eligibility criteria in subsection (d) of this
Code section shall, upon utilizing a contract for the improvement of the roof of an existing
structure or building to a supplier approved by a cooperative purchasing organization and
designated by the Department of Administrative Services as an authorized source of supply
pursuant to subsection (i) of Code Section 36-91-21, receive low-wealth capital outlay
grants pursuant to this Code section for such roofing improvement, provided that such
improvement is included in the local school system's most recently approved local facilities
plan, as provide for in subsection (c) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 91 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public works
bidding, is amended in Code Section 36-91-2, relating to definitions, by revising paragraph
(12) as follows:
"(12) 'Public works construction' means the building, altering, repairing, improving, or
demolishing of any public structure or building or other public improvements of any kind
to any public real property other than those projects covered by Chapter 4 of Title 32 or
by Chapter 37 of Title 50. Such term does shall not include the routine operation, repair,
or maintenance of existing structures, buildings, or real property, or any energy savings
performance contract or, any improvements or installations performed as part of an
energy savings performance contract, or any improvement of the roof of an existing
structure or building; provided, however, that such improvement to the roof of an existing
structure or building shall not include any ancillary items to be placed on such roof."
H. B. 669
- 2 -

LC 49 2311
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in amended in Code Section 36-91-21, relating to
competitive award requirements, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(i) The notice and competitive award requirements of this chapter shall be deemed to have
been satisfied when a contract for the improvement of the roof of an existing structure or
building is awarded to a supplier approved by a cooperative purchasing organization and
designated by the Department of Administrative Services as an authorized source of
supply."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 669
- 3 -